src-fst-morphology-affixes-nouns.lexc.md
* **LEXICON h1** eyga
* **LEXICON h1e** 
* **LEXICON h_flt1** 
* **LEXICON h1_2** 
* **LEXICON h1_2e** 
* **LEXICON h_flt1_2** 
* **LEXICON h1_2/1_3** 
* **LEXICON h1_3** drama
* **LEXICON h1_3e** 
* **LEXICON h_flt1_3** 
* **LEXICON h2** hjarta
* **LEXICON h2e** 
* **LEXICON h3/41** 
* **LEXICON h3/5** 
* **LEXICON h3/22** 
* **LEXICON h3_s** universitet
* **LEXICON h3** orð
* **LEXICON h3e** 
* **LEXICON h_flt3f** 
* **LEXICON h_flt3** 
* **LEXICON h3_2** 
* **LEXICON h3_2e** politinum
* **LEXICON h_flt3_2** 
* **LEXICON h4** 
* **LEXICON h4e** 
* **LEXICON h_flt4** 
* **LEXICON h4_2** guv
* **LEXICON h4_2e** 
* **LEXICON h_flt4_2** 
* **LEXICON h4_3/41** 
* **LEXICON h4_3** 
* **LEXICON h4_3e** bað sg
* **LEXICON h_flt4_3** 
* **LEXICON h4_4** læ
* **LEXICON h4_4e** 
* **LEXICON h_flt4_4** 
* **LEXICON h5/3** 
* **LEXICON h5/6** 
* **LEXICON h5** 
* **LEXICON h5e** 
* **LEXICON h_flt5** 
* **LEXICON h6/4** 
* **LEXICON h6** 
* **LEXICON h6e** 
* **LEXICON h_flt6** 
* **LEXICON h7/3** 
* **LEXICON h7/3e** 
* **LEXICON h7/4** 
* **LEXICON h7** bræv
* **LEXICON h8** land
* **LEXICON h8e** land sg
* **LEXICON h_flt8** land
* **LEXICON h9/10** 
* **LEXICON h9/kv2** 
* **LEXICON h9/41** 
* **LEXICON h9** 
* **LEXICON h9e** 
* **LEXICON h_flt9** 
* **LEXICON h10** fall
* **LEXICON h10e** 
* **LEXICON h_flt10** 
* **LEXICON h11e/22f** 
* **LEXICON h_flt22/11e** 
* **LEXICON h11** hús
* **LEXICON h11e** 
* **LEXICON h_flt11** 
* **LEXICON h12** glas
* **LEXICON h12e** 
* **LEXICON h_flt12** 
* **LEXICON h13** setur
* **LEXICON h13e** 
* **LEXICON h_flt13** 
* **LEXICON h13_2** ásin
* **LEXICON h13_2e** 
* **LEXICON h_flt13_2** 
* **LEXICON h14** pistr
* **LEXICON h14e** 
* **LEXICON h_flt14** 
* **LEXICON h15** tjaldur
* **LEXICON h15e** 
* **LEXICON h_flt15** 
* **LEXICON h16** skýggj
* **LEXICON h16e** 
* **LEXICON h_flt16** 
* **LEXICON h16_2** hoyggj
* **LEXICON h16_2e** 
* **LEXICON h_flt16_2** 
* **LEXICON h16_3** fríggj
* **LEXICON h16_3e** 
* **LEXICON h_flt16_3** 
* **LEXICON h17** 
* **LEXICON h17e** 
* **LEXICON h_flt17** 
* **LEXICON h17_2** 
* **LEXICON h17_2e** 
* **LEXICON h18** týggi
* **LEXICON h18e** 
* **LEXICON h_flt18** 
* **LEXICON h19** prógv
* **LEXICON h19e** 
* **LEXICON h_flt19** 
* **LEXICON h20** búgv
* **LEXICON h20e** 
* **LEXICON h_flt20** 
* **LEXICON h21** plógv
* **LEXICON h21e** 
* **LEXICON h_flt21** 
* **LEXICON h22** ber
* **LEXICON h22e** 
* **LEXICON h_flt22** 
* **LEXICON h23** egg
* **LEXICON h23e** 
* **LEXICON h_flt23** 
* **LEXICON h24** 
* **LEXICON h24e** 
* **LEXICON h_flt24** 
* **LEXICON h25** merki
* **LEXICON h25e** 
* **LEXICON h_flt25** 
* **LEXICON h_flt26** tiðindi
* **LEXICON h_flt27** systkin
* **LEXICON h28** bakarí
* **LEXICON h28e** 
* **LEXICON h_flt28** 
* **LEXICON h29** kamar
* **LEXICON h29e** 
* **LEXICON h_flt29** 
* **LEXICON h30** summar
* **LEXICON h31** nummar
* **LEXICON h32** høvd
* **LEXICON h33** høvur
* **LEXICON h34** fæ
* **LEXICON h34e** 
* **LEXICON h_flt34** 
* **LEXICON h3e/kv2** 
* **LEXICON h36** 
* **LEXICON h36e** 
* **LEXICON h_flt36** 
* **LEXICON h37** 
* **LEXICON h37e** 
* **LEXICON h_flt37** 
* **LEXICON h38** 
* **LEXICON h40** 
* **LEXICON h40_2** 
* **LEXICON h41/9** 
* **LEXICON h41** 
* **LEXICON h41e** 
* **LEXICON h_flt41** 

# Layer 2: Case inflection 

This is the second layer. Here we do indefinite
forms and compounds.

## Lexica for masculine nouns

### Lexica for weak case suffixes.

#### Singular
* **LEXICON W_M_SGNOM** for weak masculines, pointing to definites
* **LEXICON W_M_SGACC** etc for risan
* **LEXICON W_M_SGDAT** for 
* **LEXICON W_M_SGDAT_mixed** for felagnum
* **LEXICON W_M_SGGEN** for 

#### Plural
* **LEXICON W_M_PLNOM** for -ar-
* **LEXICON W_M_PLNOM_UR** for -ur-
* **LEXICON W_M_PLACC** for -ar-
* **LEXICON W_M_PLACC_UR** for -ur-
* **LEXICON W_M_PLDAT** for -u-
* **LEXICON W_M_PLGEN** for -a-

### Strong case suffixes

#### Nominative Sg
* **LEXICON S_M_SGNOM** 
* **LEXICON S_M_SGNOM_NULL** 

#### Accusative Sg
* **LEXICON S_M_SGACC** 

#### Dative Sg
* **LEXICON S_M_SGDAT** 
* **LEXICON S_M_SGDAT_2** 
* **LEXICON S_M_SGDAT_NULL** 

#### Genitive Sg
* **LEXICON S_M_SGGEN** 
* **LEXICON S_M_SGGEN_NULL** 
* **LEXICON S_M_SGGEN_AR** 

### Plural forms

#### Nominative
* **LEXICON S_M_PLNOM** 
* **LEXICON S_M_PLNOM_IR** 
* **LEXICON S_M_PLNOM_UR** 
* **LEXICON S_M_PLNOM_NULL** 
* **LEXICON S_M_PLNOM_NULL_NULL** 

#### Accusative
* **LEXICON S_M_PLACC** 
* **LEXICON S_M_PLACC_IR** 
* **LEXICON S_M_PLACC_UR** 
* **LEXICON S_M_PLACC_NULL** 
* **LEXICON S_M_PLACC_NULL_NULL** 

#### Dative
* **LEXICON S_M_PLDAT** 
* **LEXICON S_M_PLDATm** skóm

#### Genitive
* **LEXICON S_M_PLGEN** 

## Feminine forms

### Singular case suffixes.

#### Nominative
* **LEXICON W_F_SGNOM** 
* **LEXICON S_F_SGNAD** 

#### Oblique
* **LEXICON W_F_SGOBL** 
* **LEXICON S_F_SGGEN** 
* **LEXICON S_F_SGGEN_NULL** 

### Plural case suffixes
* **LEXICON F_PLNA_UR** 
* **LEXICON F_PLNA_IR** 
* **LEXICON F_PLNA_AR** 
* **LEXICON F_PLNA_NULL** 
* **LEXICON F_PLDAT** 
* **LEXICON F_PLGEN** 

## Neuter forms
### Singular
* **LEXICON S_N_SGNA** 
* **LEXICON S_N_SGDG** 
* **LEXICON S_N_SGD** 
* **LEXICON S_N_SGG** 
* **LEXICON S_N_SGDG_is** 
* **LEXICON S_N_SGD_i** 
* **LEXICON S_N_SGG_s** 
* **LEXICON S_N_SGG_is** 
* **LEXICON 0_N_SGNA** 
* **LEXICON i_N_SGNA** 
### Plural
* **LEXICON N_PLNA_u_ur** 
* **LEXICON N_PLNA_i_ir** 
* **LEXICON N_PLNA** 
* **LEXICON N_PLD** 
* **LEXICON N_PLG** 
* **LEXICON N_PLG_na** 
## Common cases
* **LEXICON DF_D_PL** 
* **LEXICON DF_G_PL** 

# Layer 3: Definite inflection 

This is the **third layer**. Here we do the indefinite and definite forms.
These are common to (almost) all different paradigms, hence they are 
gathered here.

## Masculine forms

### Masc def sg
* **LEXICON DF_N_SGm** for 
* **LEXICON DF_N_SGm_indef** for 
* **LEXICON DF_N_SGm_def** for 
* **LEXICON DF_A_SGm** for 
* **LEXICON DF_A_SGm_indef** for 
* **LEXICON DF_A_SGm_def** for 
* **LEXICON DF_D_SGm** for 
* **LEXICON DF_G_SGm** for 

### Masc def pl
* **LEXICON DF_N_PLm** for 
* **LEXICON DF_N_PLm_indef** for 
* **LEXICON DF_N_PLm_def** for 
* **LEXICON DF_A_PLm** for 
* **LEXICON DF_A_PLm_indef** for 
* **LEXICON DF_A_PLm_def** for 

## Feminine forms

###  Fem Sg
* **LEXICON DF_N_SGf_W** for 
* **LEXICON DF_N_SGf_S** for 
* **LEXICON DF_A_SGf_W** for 
* **LEXICON DF_A_SGf_S** for 
* **LEXICON DF_D_SGf_W** for 
* **LEXICON DF_D_SGf_S** for 
* **LEXICON DF_G_SGf_W** for 
* **LEXICON DF_G_SGf_S** for 

### Feminine plural forms
* **LEXICON DF_NA_PLf** for *nar
* **LEXICON DF_NA_PLf_inar** for *inar

## Neuter forms

### Neuter sg
* **LEXICON DF_NA_SGn** 
* **LEXICON DF_NA_SGn_indef** 
* **LEXICON DF_NA_SGn_def** 
* **LEXICON DF_D_SGn** 
* **LEXICON DF_G_SGn** 
* **LEXICON g_indef_r** 
* **LEXICON DF_G_SGn_a** 
* **LEXICON DF_NA_PLn** 
* **LEXICON DF_NA_PLn_W** 

This concludes the nominal morphology.

# Compound flags
The rest of the file contains **flags**, that govern
the ways stems may be combined.
* **LEXICON MscNom_Flag** for 
* **LEXICON MscObl_Flag** for 
* **LEXICON FemNom_Flag** for 
* **LEXICON FemObl_Flag** for 
* **LEXICON Neu_Flag** for 
* **LEXICON Pl_Flag** for 
* **LEXICON p24** 

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-fao/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc)</small>

---
